District of Columbia statutes.
5-101.01

Police District created.

The District is constituted a police district, to be called “The Metropolitan Police District of the District of Columbia.”

R.S., D.C., § 321
1973 Ed., § 4-101.
1981 Ed., § 4-101.
Metropolitan Police, assistance to Secret Service, see § 1-207.31.
District of Columbia, territorial area, see §§ 1-101, 1-207.17.
Demonstrations, marches, and assemblies relating to federal government, reimbursement of costs incurred by District, see § 1-207.37.

Special Committee on Police Misconduct and Personnel Management Extension Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-690, effective September 22, 1998, the Council approved an extension for the Special Committee on Police Misconduct and Personnel Management.

Council Police Misconduct and Personnel Management Special Committee Creation Emergency Resolution of 1997: Pursuant to Resolution 12-344, effective December 16, 1997, the Council approved the creation of a special committee for the Council of Police Misconduct and Personnel Management.